trunk/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="вле/зе__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зи</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зете</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зам</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зеш</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зе</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>земе</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зете</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зат</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist дојд/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гов</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зе</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зе</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>говме</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>говте</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гоа</l>
          <r>зе<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

		<!-- par: дојд
		group: e
		cat_type: finite
		stem: o -->
    <pardef n="дојд/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist дојд/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ов</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>овме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>овте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оа</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

		<!-- par: одбие
		group: e
		cat_type: finite
		stem: no stem -->
    <pardef n="одби/е__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ј</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist одби/е -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ив</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ја</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
		<!-- par: замине
		group: e
		cat_type: finite
		stem: а -->

   <e lm="однесе"><i>однес</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="даде"><i>дад</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="создаде"><i>создад</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="додаде"><i>додад</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="продаде"><i>продад</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="воведе"><i>вовед</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="поведе"><i>повед</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="спроведе"><i>спровед</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="презеде"><i>презед</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="обиде"><i>обид</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="дојде"><i>дојд</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="однесе"><i>однес</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пренесе"><i>пренес</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="донесе"><i>донес</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="придонесе"><i>придонес</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="најде"><i>најд</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="предаде"><i>предад</i><par n="дојд/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="влезе"><i>вле</i><par n="вле/зе__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="излезе"><i>изле</i><par n="вле/зе__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="одбие"><i>одби</i><par n="одби/е__vblex"/></e>
